Hawaii statutes.
§200-2 Board of land and natural resources,
powers and duties. (a) The board shall have the primary responsibility
for administering the ocean recreation and coastal areas programs and
performing the functions heretofore performed by the department of transportation
and the department of public safety in the areas of boating safety,
conservation, search and rescue, and security of small boat harbor environs.

(b) The board shall not transfer its
jurisdiction, management, or operations of the small boat harbors to any other
department or agency or any county in any manner unless expressly provided by
law. [L 1991, c 272, pt of §2; am L 1996, c 296, §3; am L 2007, c 270, §2]

Cross References

Alien aquatic organisms, see §187A-32(b).

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next